Utah statutes.
77-23a-8.   Court order to authorize or approve interception -- Procedure.
(1)  The attorney general of the state, any assistant attorney general
specially designated by the attorney general, any county attorney, district
attorney, deputy county attorney, or deputy district attorney specially
designated by the county attorney or by the district attorney, may authorize
an application to a judge of competent jurisdiction for an order for an
interception of wire, electronic, or oral communications by any law
enforcement agency of the state, the federal government or of any political
subdivision of the state that is responsible for investigating the type of
offense for which the application is made.
(2)  The judge may grant the order in conformity with the required procedures
when the interception sought may provide or has provided evidence of the
commission of:
(a)  any act:
(i)  prohibited by the criminal provisions of:
(A)  Title 58, Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act;
(B)  Title 58, Chapter 37c, Utah Controlled Substances Precursor Act; or
(C)  Title 58, Chapter 37d, Clandestine Drug Lab Act; and
(ii)  punishable by a term of imprisonment of more than one year;
(b)  any act prohibited by the criminal provisions of Title 61, Chapter 1,
Utah Uniform Securities Act and punishable by a term of imprisonment of more
than one year;
(c)  an offense:
(i)  of:
(A)  attempt, Section 76-4-101;
(B)  conspiracy, Section 76-4-201;
(C)  solicitation, Section 76-4-203; and
(ii)  punishable by a term of imprisonment of more than one year;
(d)  terroristic threat offense punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment
of more than one year, Section 76-5-107;
(e) (i)  aggravated murder, Section 76-5-202;
(ii)  murder, Section 76-5-203; or
(iii)  manslaughter, Section 76-5-205;
(f) (i)  kidnapping, Section 76-5-301;
(ii)  child kidnapping, Section 76-5-301.1; or
(iii)  aggravated kidnapping, Section 76-5-302;
(g) (i)  arson, Section 76-6-102; or
(ii)  aggravated arson, Section 76-6-103;
(h) (i)  burglary, Section 76-6-202; or
(ii)  aggravated burglary, Section 76-6-203;
(i) (i)  robbery, Section 76-6-301; or
(ii)  aggravated robbery, Section 76-6-302;
(j)  an offense:
(i)  of:
(A)  theft, Section 76-6-404;
(B)  theft by deception, Section 76-6-405; or
(C)  theft by extortion, Section 76-6-406; and
(ii)  punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of more than one year;
(k)  receiving stolen property offense punishable by a maximum term of
imprisonment of more than one year, Section 76-6-408;
(l)  a financial card transaction offense punishable by a maximum term of
imprisonment of more than one year, Section 76-6-506.1, 76-6-506.2,
76-6-506.3, 76-6-506.4, 76-6-506.5, or 76-6-506.6;
(m)  bribery of a labor official, Section 76-6-509;
(n)  bribery or threat to influence a publicly exhibited contest, Section
76-6-514;
(o)  a criminal simulation offense punishable by a maximum term of
imprisonment of more than one year, Section 76-6-518;
(p)  criminal usury, Section 76-6-520;
(q)  a fraudulent insurance act offense punishable by a maximum term of
imprisonment of more than one year, Section 76-6-521;
(r)  a violation of Chapter 6, Part 7, Computer Crimes Act, punishable by a
maximum term of imprisonment of more than one year, Section 76-6-703;
(s)  bribery to influence official or political actions, Section 76-8-103;
(t)  misusing public moneys, Section 76-8-402;
(u)  tampering with a witness or soliciting or receiving a bribe, Section
76-8-508;
(v)  retaliation against a witness, victim, or informant, Section 76-8-508.3;
(w)  tampering with a juror, retaliation against a juror, Section 76-8-508.5;
(x)  extortion or bribery to dismiss criminal proceeding, Section 76-8-509;
(y)  obstruction of justice, Section 76-8-306;
(z)  destruction of property to interfere with preparation for defense or war,
Section 76-8-802;
(aa) an attempt to commit crimes of sabotage, Section 76-8-804;
(bb)  conspiracy to commit crimes of sabotage, Section 76-8-805;
(cc)  advocating criminal syndicalism or sabotage, Section 76-8-902;
(dd)  assembly for advocating criminal syndicalism or sabotage, Section
76-8-903;
(ee)  riot punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of more than one year,
Section 76-9-101;
(ff)  dog fighting, training dogs for fighting, dog fighting exhibitions
punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of more than one year, Section
76-9-301.1;
(gg)  explosive, chemical, or incendiary device and parts, possession, use, or
removal, Section 76-10-306;
(hh)  explosive, chemical, or incendiary device, delivery to a common carrier
or mailing, Section 76-10-307;
(ii)  exploiting prostitution, Section 76-10-1305;
(jj)  aggravated exploitation of prostitution, Section 76-10-1306;
(kk)  bus hijacking, assault with intent to commit hijacking, dangerous weapon
or firearm, Section 76-10-1504;
(ll)  discharging firearms and hurling missiles, Section 76-10-1505;
(mm)  violations of the Pattern of Unlawful Activity Act and the offenses
listed under the definition of unlawful activity in the act, including the
offenses not punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of more than one
year when those offenses are investigated as predicates for the offenses
prohibited by the act, Section 76-10-1602;
(nn)  communications fraud, Section 76-10-1801;
(oo)  money laundering, Sections 76-10-1903 and 76-10-1904; or
(pp)  reporting by a person engaged in a trade or business when the offense is
punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of more than one year, Section
76-10-1906.
